District of Columbia statutes.
38-754.03

Administration of Community Schools Incentive Initiative.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish and administer the multiyear Community Schools Incentive Initiative (“Incentive Initiative”) to award multiyear grants to incentivize the establishment of no fewer than 5 new community schools within one year of June 19, 2012, with priority given to schools that have:

(1)

A focus on mental health prevention and treatment services;

(2)

A student population where more than 60% of the students are at-risk as defined in § 38-2901(2A); and

(3)

A focus on improving academic outcomes for students.

(b)

The Mayor shall promote and encourage the use of public school and public charter school facilities by community and neighborhood groups.

(c)

Within 60 days of June 19, 2012, the Mayor shall convene a Community Schools Advisory Committee that shall consist of:

(1)

The Chancellor of the District of Columbia Public Schools, or designee;

(2)

The Director of the Department of Parks and Recreation, or designee;

(3)

The Director of the Department of Health, or designee;

(4)

The Director of the Department of Employment Services, or designee;

(5)

The President of the State Board of Education, or designee;

(6)

The President of the University of the District of Columbia, or designee;

(7)

The President of the University of the District of Columbia Community College, or designee;

(8)

The Deputy Mayor for Education, or designee;

(9)

Representatives from at least 4 community-based organizations;

(10)

Representatives from at least 4 philanthropic or business organizations;

(11)

The Director of the Public Charter School Board, or designee; and

(12)

The directors of 2 public charter schools.

(d)

The Community Schools Advisory Committee shall:

(1)

Advise the Mayor on the development of the Incentive Initiative, including the development of a results-based framework and accompanying performance indicators with which to measure the success of the Incentive Initiative;

(2)

Participate in the selection process for Incentive Initiative grantees;

(3)

Develop recommendations on how all public schools can become centers of their communities by opening school facilities for nonprofit and community use;

(4)

Identify potential funding sources for the provision of eligible services within the Incentive Initiative;

(5)

Develop yearly measurable performance goals to assess:

(A)

How to increase the percentage of families and students receiving services for each year of the Incentive Initiative;

(B)

The outcomes for students and families, particularly student academic achievement; and

(C)

The number of public schools and public charter schools that have established formal relationships with community and neighborhood groups to use school facilities; and

(6)

Meet at least annually to review and evaluate the annual progress of the Incentive Initiative and to make recommendations, if any, to the Mayor and the Council for improvement of the Incentive Initiative.

(e)

Within 180 days of June 19, 2012, the Mayor shall establish a process for awarding grants of no more than $200,000 a year to successful eligible consortiums and shall require that each application for an Incentive Initiative grant include:

(1)

An assessment of the local school community, the neighborhood’s needs and assets, and an analysis of the academic, health, and social service needs of the target population of students;

(2)

A description of the proposed eligible consortium, including the type and number of community partners, as defined in § 38-754.02, and how the eligible consortium shall address the needs and build upon the assets of the community that the eligible consortium will serve;

(3)

A proposed budget and narrative description of the proposed use of grant funds, which budget shall reflect a core concept of service coordination and integration and the narrative describe how the eligible consortium shall provide at least 4 additional eligible services that did not exist before the establishment of the eligible consortium;

(4)

The identification of operational funding for eligible services and community partners;

(5)

A plan for the development of a community advisory board to include members of school leadership, school faculty, parents of school students, community leaders, community-based organizations, and other community members;

(6)

A narrative description of the program approach, including an implementation action plan and explanation of how the chosen approach is evidence-based either through research or other proven community schools models; and

(7)

A plan for quarterly qualitative and quantitative program evaluation, including measurable indicators of success in areas such as student academic achievement; graduation and attendance rate; and improvement in student health and socio-emotional well-being.

(f)

The Mayor shall:

(1)

Conduct periodic evaluations of the progress achieved with funds allocated under a grant, consistent with the purposes of this section;

(2)

Use the evaluations to refine and improve activities conducted with the grant and the performance measures for the activities;

(3)

Make the results of the evaluations publicly available, including providing public notice of the availability; and

(4)

Identify best practices and lessons learned for the purpose of informing the District-wide community school policy.

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 403, 59 DCR 3642
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 4192, 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote (a)(1) and (2); added (a)(3); added (d)(6) and made related changes; rewrote (e)(1); and added (e)(6) and (7) and made related changes.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 4192 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).